District of Columbia statutes.
22-2714

Abatement of nuisance under § 22-2713 by injunction — Temporary injunction.

Whenever a nuisance is kept, maintained, or exists, as defined in § 22-2713, the United States Attorney for the District of Columbia, the Attorney General of the United States, the Corporation Counsel of the District of Columbia, or any citizen of the District of Columbia, may maintain an action in equity in the name of the United States of America or in the name of the District of Columbia, upon the relation of such United States Attorney for the District of Columbia, the Attorney General of the United States, the Corporation Counsel of the District of Columbia, or citizen, to perpetually enjoin said nuisance, the person or persons conducting or maintaining the same, and the owner or agent of the building or ground upon which said nuisance exists. In such action the court, or a judge in vacation, shall, upon the presentation of a petition therefor alleging that the nuisance complained of exists, allow a temporary writ of injunction, without bond, if it shall be made to appear to the satisfaction of the court or judge by evidence in the form of affidavits, depositions, oral testimony, or otherwise, as the complainant may elect, unless the court or judge by previous order shall have directed the form and manner in which it shall be presented. Three days notice, in writing, shall be given the defendant of the hearing of the application, and if then continued at his instance the writ as prayed shall be granted as a matter of course. When an injunction has been granted it shall be binding on the defendant throughout the District of Columbia and any violation of the provisions of injunction herein provided shall be a contempt as hereinafter provided.

Feb. 7, 1914, 38 Stat. 280, ch. 16, § 2
June 19, 1998, D.C. Law 12-127, § 2(b), 45 DCR 1304

History

Action to abate, enjoin, and prevent a drug-related nuisance, where there is reason to believe such exists, see § 42-3101 et seq.

Cross References

This section is referenced in § 22-2716.

Section References

1981 Ed., § 22-2714.
1973 Ed., § 22-2714.

Prior Codifications